South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3268.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 4 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 4-1-190. Notwithstanding another provision of law: (1) the legislative delegation of a county may, by the adoption of a resolution, appoint the members of a county recreation commission that was established as a special purpose district prior to the adoption of home rule; and (2) the members of a county recreation commission whom the delegation appoints pursuant to item (1) serve at the pleasure of the county legislative delegation, and such commission members may be removed at any time by the county legislative delegation. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----